Tennessee, session 114, HB0559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-199(b)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting the language "Physically hold or support, with any part of the person's body," and
substituting instead the language "In a work zone when employees of the department of
transportation or construction workers are present or in a marked school zone when a warning
flasher or flashers are in operation, physically hold or support, with any part of the person's
body,".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-199(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(1)
(A) A violation of subdivision (b)(1)(A) is a Class C misdemeanor, subject
only to imposition of a fine of two hundred dollars ($200).
(B) A violation of subdivisions (b)(1)(B)–(b)(1)(E) is a Class C
misdemeanor, subject only to imposition of a fine not to exceed fifty dollars
($50.00). However, if the violation is the person's third or subsequent offense or
if the violation results in an accident, the fine is one hundred dollars ($100); or if
the violation occurs in a work zone when employees of the department of
transportation or construction workers are present or in a marked school zone
HB0559
001962
- 1 -

when a warning flasher or flashers are in operation, the fine is two hundred
dollars ($200).
(C) Any person violating this section is subject to the imposition of court
costs not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00), including, but not limited to, any
statutory fees of officers. State and local litigation taxes are not applicable to a
case prosecuted under this section.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001962